Washington statutes.
RCW 36.55.050

Hearing—Order.

The hearing may be adjourned from time to time by the order of the board of county commissioners. If, after the hearing, the board deems it to be for the public interest to grant the franchise in whole or in part, it may make and enter a resolution to that effect and may require the applicant to place his or her utility and its appurtenances in such location on or along the county road as the board finds will cause the least interference with other uses of the road.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4094; 1963 c 4 s 36.55.050. Prior: 1961 c 55 s 4; prior: 1937 c 187 s 38, part; RRS s 6450-38, part.]